Utah statutes.
63M-1-1222.   Powers and effectiveness.

(1)  This part may not be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any power which the board might otherwise have under any other law of this state and the provisions of this part are cumulative to those powers.

(2)  This part shall be construed to provide a complete, additional, and alternative method for performing the duties authorized and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional powers to those conferred by any other laws.

(3)  The provisions of any contract entered into by the board or the Utah fund of funds may not be compromised, diminished, invalidated, or affected by the:

(a)  level, timing, or degree of success of the Utah fund of funds or the investment funds in which the Utah fund of funds invests; or

(b)  extent to which the investment funds are:

(i)  invested in Utah venture capital projects; or

(ii)  successful in accomplishing any economic development objectives.

